Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 7.1. Temporary Registration for Certain Overseas Voters.

§§ 24.2-443.1 through 24.2-443.4.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 353, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions, see the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act, Chapter 4.1 (24.2-451 et seq.).

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-443.1

, pertaining to eligibility for temporary registration, derived from Acts 1999, c. 795; 2001, c. 629. Former § 24.2-443.2, pertaining to application for temporary registration, derived from
Acts 1999, c. 795; 2004, c. 410. Former § 24.2-443.3, pertaining to when registration permitted, derived from
Acts 1999, c. 795; 2004, c. 410; 2007, c. 311; 2010, cc. 449, 645; 2011, cc. 427, 458. Former § 24.2-443.4, pertaining to absentee ballots for persons registered under this article, derived from
Acts 1999, c. 795.